Source/desktopeditors/dictionaries/uz_Latn_UZ/uz_Latn_UZ.aff
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizgadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizgada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizgadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizgamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizgaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdanmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdandir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdanda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdandirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdanmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdanku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaringizdaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarningmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarningdir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarningda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarningdirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarningmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarningku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimnimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimnidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimnida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimnidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimnimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimning [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimningmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimningdir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimningda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimningdirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimningmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimningku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimgami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimgadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimgada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimgadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimgamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimgaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarini [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarinimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarinidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarinida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarinidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarinimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlariniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarining [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlariningmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlariningdir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlariningda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlariningdirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlariningmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlariningku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlariga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarigami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarigadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarigada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarigadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarigamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarigaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaridaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimiznimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimiznidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimiznida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimiznidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimiznimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizning [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizningmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizningdir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizningda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizningdirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizningmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizningku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizgami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizgadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizgada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizgadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizgamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizgaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlarimizdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringiznimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringiznidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringiznida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringiznidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringiznimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizning [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizningmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizningdir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizningda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizningdirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizningmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizningku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizgami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizgadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizgada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizgadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizgamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizgaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ayotganlaringizdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarningmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarningdir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarningda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarningdirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarningmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarningku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimnimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimnidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimnida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimnidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimnimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimning [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimningmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimningdir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimningda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimningdirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimningmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimningku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimgami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimgadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimgada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimgadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimgamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimgaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimdaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarini [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarinimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarinidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarinida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarinidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarinimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlariniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarining [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlariningmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlariningdir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlariningda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlariningdirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlariningmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlariningku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlariga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarigami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarigadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarigada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarigadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarigamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarigaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridandir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridanda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridandirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridanmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridanku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlaridaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizni [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimiznimi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimiznidir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimiznida [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimiznidirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimiznimikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizniku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizning [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizningmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizningdir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizningda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizningdirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizningmikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizningku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizga [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizgami [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizgadir [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizgada [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizgadirda [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizgamikan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizgaku [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizdan [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 mayotganlarimizdanmi [^ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
